Arkansas, session 2025, HB1114.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS. There is hereby established
for the Office of the Commissioner of State Lands for the 2025-2026 fiscal
year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item No. of Fiscal Year
No. Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) CHIEF DEPUTY 1 $142,769
(2) GENERAL COUNSEL 1 $127,941
(3) REAL ESTATE ADMINISTRATOR 1 $125,859
(4) IT ADMINISTRATOR 1 $125,859
(5) SPECIAL PROJECTS COORDINATOR 1 $94,901
*JAR017*
01/07/2025 2:22:07 PM JAR017

HB1114
(6) NETWORK ADMINISTRATOR 1 $94,901
(7) DIRECTOR OF GOVERNMENT AFFAIRS 1 $92,081
(8) REAL ESTATE DIRECTOR 1 $92,081
(9) PUBLIC RELATIONS DIRECTOR 1 $92,081
(10) OPERATIONS DIRECTOR 1 $92,081
(11) FISCAL DIRECTOR 1 $92,081
(12) HUMAN RESOURCES SUPERVISOR 1 $82,523
(13) GOVERNMENTAL RELATIONS LIAISON 1 $82,523
(14) FISCAL ASSOCIATE I 1 $82,523
(15) ASSIST. DIRECTOR OF REAL ESTATE 1 $82,523
(16) ASSIST. DIRECTOR OF PUBLIC RELATIONS 1 $82,523
(17) REDEMPTION COORDINATOR 1 $73,959
(18) PUBLIC AFFAIRS LIAISON 1 $73,959
(19) MINERAL LEASING & NATURAL RES COORD 1 $73,959
(20) FISCAL ASSOCIATE II 2 $73,959
(21) RESEARCH TECH 5 $66,285
(22) RESEARCH COORDINATOR 1 $66,285
(23) RECORDS SPECIALIST 1 $66,285
(24) PARALEGAL 1 $66,285
(25) MANAGEMENT SECRETARY 2 $66,285
(26) FISCAL SECRETARY 1 $66,285
(27) EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT 1 $66,285
(28) REDEMPTION TECH 3 $59,409
(29) PUBLIC RELATIONS SECRETARY 1 $59,409
(30) ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST 1 $59,409
(31) REAL ESTATE SECRETARY 1 $53,347
(32) ADMINISTRATION 1 $53,347
(33) RECORDS RETENTION TECH 1 $47,728
(34) CUSTOMER SERVICE ASSOCIATE 1 $47,728
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 42

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - OPERATIONS. There is hereby authorized, for
the Office of the Commissioner of State Lands for the 2025-2026 fiscal year,
the following maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known
as "Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes:
five (5) temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at rates of pay not
01/07/2025 2:22:07 PM JAR017

HB1114
to exceed those provided in the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act,
or its successor, or this act for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the Commissioner of State Lands, to be payable from the State Central
Services Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of the
Commissioner of State Lands for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $3,249,660
(02) EXTRA HELP 40,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 1,082,147
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 25,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $4,396,807

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - DELINQUENT TAX. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Commissioner of State Lands, to be payable from cash
funds as defined by Arkansas Code §19-4-801, for operating expenses and for
distributing proceeds from the sale or redemption of tax delinquent land as
prescribed by Chapter 37 of Title 26 of the Arkansas Code by the Commissioner
of State Lands for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $1,500,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 2,000,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
01/07/2025 2:22:07 PM JAR017

HB1114
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(02) REFUND/RECORDING FEE REIMBURSEMENTS 1,300,000
(03) DELINQUENT TAX REMITTAL/SALE REFUNDS 27,500,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $32,300,000

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - CAPITAL OUTLAY/OPERATING EXPENSES. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Commissioner of State Lands, to be payable from
cash funds as defined by Arkansas Code §19-4-801, for operating expenses and
capital outlay of the Commissioner of State Lands for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) CAPITAL OUTLAY/OPERATING EXP $267,800

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - SUBMERGED LANDS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Commissioner of State Lands, to be payable from cash
funds as defined by Arkansas Code §19-4-801, for personal services and
operating expenses for projects involving submerged land by the Commissioner
of State Lands for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) SUBMERGED LANDS $250,000

SECTION 7. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 8. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
01/07/2025 2:22:07 PM JAR017

HB1114
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 9. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the
appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

















01/07/2025 2:22:07 PM JAR017